zh-TW: 電子器材 > 網路: 橋接器/路由器; 集中器和數據多工器; 集線器和交換器; 數據機配件; 數據機; 網路介面卡; 網路安全/防火牆裝置; 乙太網電力轉接器; 印表機伺服器; 中繼器和收發器
ja: 電子機器 > ネットワーク: ブリッジ・ルーター; コンセントレータ・マルチプレクサ; ハブ・スイッチ; モデム関連用品; モデム; ネットワークカード・アダプター; ネットワークセキュリティ・ファイアウォール; パワーインジェクタ・スプリッタ; プリントサーバー; 中継器・トランシーバー
lt-LT: Elektronika > Tinklai: Tinklų tiltai ir maršrutizatoriai; Koncentratoriai ir multiplekseriai; Šakotuvai ir jungikliai; Modemų priedai; Modemai; Tinklo plokštės ir adapteriai; Tinklo saugos ir užkardų įrenginiai; Maitinimo eternetu adapteriai; Spausdinimo serveriai; Kartotuvai ir siųstuvai-imtuvai
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Ligação em rede: Pontes e routers; Concentradores e multiplexadores; Cubos e interruptores; Acessórios de modem; Modems; Cartões de rede e adaptadores; Segurança de rede e dispositivos firewall; Adaptadores de alimentação via internet POE; Servidores de impressão; Repetidores e transcetores
fr: Appareil électronique > Réseaux: Ponts et routeurs; Concentrateurs et multiplexeurs; Hubs et commutateurs; Accessoires pour modems; Modems; Cartes réseau et adaptateurs; Pare-feu et dispositifs de sécurité réseau; Adaptateurs PoE; Serveurs d’impression; Répéteurs et émetteurs-récepteurs
ko: 전자기기 > 네트워킹: 브리지/라우터; 집중화기/멀티플렉서; 허브/스위치; 모뎀 부대용품; 모뎀; 네트워크 카드/어댑터; 네트워크 보안/방화벽 장치; POE 어댑터; 프린트 서버; 리피터/트랜스시버
es: Electrónica > Redes: Puentes y enrutadores; Concentradores y multiplexores; Concentradores y conmutadores; Accesorios para módems; Módems; Adaptadores y tarjetas de red; Dispositivos firewall y seguridad de red; Adaptadores de Power over Ethernet; Servidores de impresión; Repetidores y transceptores
bg-BG: Електроника > Мрежово оборудване: Мостове и рутери; Концентратори и мултиплексори; Хъбове и комутатори; Аксесоари за модем; Модеми; Мрежови карти и адаптери; Устройства за мрежова сигурност и защитна стена; Ethernet захранващи адаптери; Принт сървъри; Ретранслатори и приемно-предавателни радиостанции
fi: Elektroniikka > Verkkojen toteutus: Sillat ja reitittimet; Keskittimet ja multiplekserit; Hubit ja kytkimet; Modeemin lisävarusteet; Modeemit; Verkkokortit ja -muuntimet; Verkon turvallisuus- ja palomuurilaitteet; PoE-adapterit; Tulostuspalvelimet; Toistimet ja lähetin-vastaanottimet
hu: Elektronika > Hálózatépítés: Hidak és útválasztók; Koncentrátorok és multiplexerek; Hubok és kapcsolók; Modemkiegészítők; Modemek; Hálózati kártyák és adapterek; Hálózatbiztonsági és tűzfaleszközök; Power Over Ethernet adapterek; Nyomtatószerverek; Átjátszók és adó-vevők
tr: Elektronik > Ağ Sistemleri: Köprüler ve Yönlendiriciler; Yoğunlaştırıcılar ve Çoklayıcılar; Hublar ve Anahtarlar; Modem Aksesuarları; Modemler; Ağ Kartları ve Adaptörleri; Ağ Güvenliği ve Güvenlik Duvarı Cihazları; Ethernet Üzerinden Güç Adaptörleri; Yazıcı Sunucuları; Repeaterlar ve Alıcı Vericiler
pl: Elektronika > Sieci: Mostki i routery; Koncentratory i multipleksery; Huby i switche; Akcesoria do modemów; Modemy; Karty i adaptery sieciowe; Sprzęt do bezpieczeństwa sieciowego i firewalle; Zasilacze typu power injector i power splitter; Serwery druku; Regeneratory sygnału i transceivery
sl-SI: Elektronika > Mreženje: Mostovi in usmerjevalniki; Koncentratorji in multiplekserji; Vozlišča in stikala; Dodatki za modeme; Modemi; Omrežne kartice in adapterji; Naprave za varnost omrežja in požarni zidovi; Adapterji za napajanje prek etherneta; Tiskalniški strežniki; Repetitorji in oddajniki
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Δικτύωση: Γέφυρες & δρομολογητές δικτύου; Συγκεντρωτές & πολυπλέκτες; Κόμβοι & διακόπτες; Αξεσουάρ μόντεμ; Μόντεμ; Κάρτες δικτύου & προσαρμογείς; Συσκευές ασφάλειας δικτύου & τείχη προστασίας; Προσαρμογείς τροφοδοσίας μέσω Ethernet (PoE); Διακομιστές εκτύπωσης; Συσκευές επανάληψης & πομποδέκτες
da: Elektronik > Netværk: Broer og routere; Koncentratorer og multipleksere; Hubs og switches; Modem – tilbehør; Modemmer; Netværkskort og -adaptere; Netværkssikkerhed og firewallenheder; Strømfødere og -fordelere; Printerservere; Repeatere og transceivere
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Rede: Pontes e roteadores; Concentradores e multiplexadores; Hubs e interruptores; Acessórios para modem; Modens; Cartões de rede e adaptadores; Segurança de rede e dispositivos firewall; Injetores e divisores de energia; Servidores de impressão; Repetidores e transmissores
ro-RO: Electronice > Rețele: Dispozitive bridge și routere; Concentratoare și dispozitive pentru multiplexare; Hub-uri și comutatoare; Accesorii modemuri; Modemuri; Carduri și adaptoare de rețea; Dispozitive de securitate a rețelei și firewall; Adaptoare Power Over Ethernet; Servere pentru imprimare; Repetoare și aparate de emisie-recepție
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ระบบเครือข่าย: บริดจ์และเราเตอร์; ตัวรวมช่องสัญญาณและอุปกรณ์รวมส่งสัญญาณ; ฮับและสวิตช์; อุปกรณ์โมเด็ม; โมเด็ม; การ์ดและอะแดปเตอร์เครือข่าย; ความปลอดภัยของเครือข่ายและอุปกรณ์ไฟร์วอลล์; อะแดปเตอร์การจ่ายไฟบนสาย LAN; เซิร์ฟเวอร์การพิมพ์; เครื่องทวนสัญญาณและเครื่องรับส่ง
de: Elektronik > Netzwerktechnik: Bridges & Router; Konzentratoren & Multiplexer; Hubs & Schalter; Modemzubehör; Modems; Netzwerkkarten; Netzwerksicherheitssysteme & Firewalls; PoE-Adapter; Druckerserver; Repeater & Sende/-Empfangsgeräte
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Nối mạng: Cầu nối & Bộ định tuyến; Bộ tập trung và bộ trộn tín hiệu; Thiết bị kết nối trung tâm và chia cổng mạng; Phụ kiện modem; Modem; Thiết bị chuyển đổi & cạc mạng; Thiết bị an ninh mạng & tường lửa; Bộ tiếp hợp cấp nguồn qua cáp ethernet; Print Server; Bộ lặp và bộ thu phát
nl: Elektronica > Netwerken: Bridges en routers; Concentrators en multiplexers; Hubs en switches; Modemaccessoires; Modems; Netwerkkaarten en -adapters; Netwerkbeveiliging en firewallapparaten; Stroominjectoren en -splitters; Afdrukservers; Repeaters en transceivers
en: Electronics > Networking: Bridges & Routers; Concentrators & Multiplexers; Hubs & Switches; Modem Accessories; Modems; Network Cards & Adapters; Network Security & Firewall Devices; Power Over Ethernet Adapters; Print Servers; Repeaters & Transceivers
ru: Электроника > Сетевое оборудование: Мосты и маршрутизаторы; Концентраторы и мультиплексоры; Коммутаторы; Аксессуары для модемов; Модемы; Сетевые карты и адаптеры; Устройства защиты сети и межсетевые экраны; Адаптеры PoE; Принт-серверы; Повторители и приемопередатчики
cs: Elektronika > Sítě: Síťové mosty a routery; Koncentrátory a multiplexory; Rozbočovače a přepínače; Modemy – příslušenství; Modemy; Síťové karty a adaptéry; Zařízení pro zabezpečení sítě a firewally; Napájecí zdroje a rozbočovače; Tiskové servery; Opakovače a vysílače
hr-HR: Elektronika > Umrežavanje: Mostovi i ruteri; Koncentratori i multiplekseri; Čvorišta i sklopke; Modemski dodaci; Modemi; Mrežne kartice i adapteri; Uređaji za mrežnu sigurnost i vatrozid; Power Over Ethernet adapteri; Ispisni poslužitelji; Repetitori i primopredajnici
sk-SK: Elektronika > Siete: Mosty a smerovače; Koncentrátory a multiplexory; Rozbočovače a prepínače; Príslušenstvo k modemu; Modemy; Sieťové karty a adaptéry; Zariadenia zabezpečenia siete a brány firewall; Ethernetové adaptéry napájania; Tlačové servery; Opakovače a prijímače
sv: Elektronik > Nätverk: Bryggor och routrar; Koncentrationer och multiplexrar; Hubbar och switchrar; Modemtillbehör; Modem; Nätverkskort och adaptrar; Nätverkssäkerhet och brandväggsenheter; Ströminjektorer och strömdelare; Skrivarservrar; Repeatrar och transceivrar
it: Elettronica > Rete: Bridge e router; Concentratori e multiplexer; Hub e switch; Accessori modem; Modem; Schede e adattatori di rete; Dispositivi protezione rete e firewall; Adattatori PoE; Server di stampa; Ripetitori e ricetrasmettitori
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 网络: 网桥与路由器; 集中器与复用器; 集线器与交换器; 调制解调器配件; 调制解调器; 网卡/网络适配器; 防火墙/网络安全设备; 以太网供电适配器; 打印服务器; 中继器与收发器
nb: Elektronikk > Nettverk: Broer og rutere; Konsentratorer og multipleksere; Huber og switcher; Modemtilbehør; Modemer; Nettverkskort og adaptere; Nettverkssikkerhets- og brannmurenheter; Strøm over Ethernet-adaptere; Utskriftsservere; Repeatere og transceivere